District of Columbia statutes.
3-1202.07

Board of Optometry.

(a)

There is established a Board of Optometry to consist of 5 members appointed by the Mayor.

(b)

The Board shall regulate the practice of optometry.

(c)

Of the members of the Board, 4 shall be optometrists licensed in the District and 1 shall be a consumer member.

(d)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of 3 years.

(e)

Of the members initially appointed under this section, 1 shall be appointed for a term of 1 year, 2 shall be appointed for a term of 2 years, and 2 shall be appointed for a term of 3 years.

(f)

The Board shall grant applications by licensed optometrists for certification to administer diagnostic pharmaceutical agents for applicants who demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Board that they have:

(1)

Successfully completed a Board-approved course in general and ocular pharmacology as it relates to the practice of optometry, that consists of at least 55 classroom hours, including a minimum of 10 classroom hours of clinical laboratory, offered or approved by an accredited institution of higher education; and

(2)

Passed an examination administered or approved by the Board on general and ocular pharmacology designed to test knowledge of the proper use, characteristics, pharmacological effects, indications, contraindications, and emergency care associated with the use of diagnostic pharmaceutical agents.

(g)

The Board shall grant applications for certification to administer therapeutic pharmaceutical agents to applicants who demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Board that they have:

(1)

Been certified by the Board to use diagnostic pharmaceutical agents;

(2)

Successfully completed a Board-approved course in the use of therapeutic pharmaceutical agents as it relates to the practice of optometry, offered by an accredited institution of higher learning; and

(3)

Passed an examination administered or approved by the Board on the use of therapeutic pharmaceutical agents.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 207, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(f), 42 DCR 457
July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-139, § 2(b), 45 DCR 2975
1981 Ed., § 2-3302.7.
This section is referenced in § 1-523.01 and § 3-1201.02.